Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-812
Violation; deceptive trade practice.

A violation of the Credit Services Organization Act shall be a deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1991, LB 292, § 12.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.